Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.546

Partner's transferable interest.

The only interest of a partner that is transferable is the partner's transferable interest. A transferable interest is personal property. A partner has no interest in specific partnership property.

[ 2022 c 42 s 205; 2009 c 188 s 701.]